District of Columbia statutes.
28-3106

When transfer is made or obligation is incurred.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)

A transfer is made:

(A)

With respect to an asset that is real property other than a fixture, including the interest of a seller or purchaser under a contract for the sale of the asset, when the transfer is so far perfected that a good-faith purchaser of the asset from the debtor against whom applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected cannot acquire an interest in the asset that is superior to the interest of the transferee; and

(B)

With respect to an asset that is not real property or that is a fixture, when the transfer is so far perfected that a creditor on a simple contract cannot acquire a judicial lien otherwise than under this chapter that is superior to the interest of the transferee.

(2)

If applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected as provided in paragraph (1) of this section and the transfer is not so perfected before the commencement of an action for relief under this chapter, the transfer is deemed made immediately before the commencement of the action.

(3)

If applicable law does not permit the transfer to be perfected as provided in paragraph (1) of this section, the transfer is made when it becomes effective between the debtor and the transferee.

(4)

A transfer is not made until the debtor has acquired rights in the asset transferred.

(5)

An obligation is incurred:

(A)

If oral, when it becomes effective between the parties; or

(B)

If evidenced by a writing, when the writing executed by the obligor is delivered to, or for the benefit of, the obligee.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-83, § 2, 42 DCR 6773
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 27(c), 44 DCR 1271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3106.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act.